Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.100

Scrap metal license—Penalties.

(1) It is unlawful for a person to engage in the business of a scrap metal processor, scrap metal recycler, or scrap metal supplier without having first applied for and received a scrap metal license.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person or firm engaged in the unlawful activity described in this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(b) A second or subsequent offense is a class C felony.

[ 2013 c 322 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 322 ss 12-23: "Sections 12 through 23 of this act take effect January 1, 2014." [ 2013 c 322 s 35.]

Implementation—2013 c 322 ss 12-23: "The director of the department of licensing may take the necessary steps to ensure that sections 12 through 23 of this act are implemented on January 1, 2014." [ 2013 c 322 s 36.]